Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2678.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3102 of Title 63 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 3102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Artificial intelligence." A machine-based system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual environments, including the ability to perceive real and virtual environments, to abstract the perceptions into models through automated analysis and to use model inference to formulate options for information or action. The term includes generative 12345678910111213141516171819 artificial intelligence.* * *"Generative artificial intelligence." The class of models that emulate the structure and characteristics of input data in order to generate derived synthetic content, including information such as images, videos, audio clips or text, that has been significantly modified or generated by algorithms, including by artificial intelligence.* * *Section 2. Title 63 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3107.2. Artificial intelligence.(a) Rules.--Each licensing board and licensing commission shall establish rules addressing the use of artificial intelligence by licensees when providing services within the licensee's authorized scope of practice under the applicable practice act. The rules shall be consistent with the applicable practice act.(b) Contents.--Rules shall address, at a minimum, all of the following:(1) The conditions under which a licensee may use artificial intelligence in providing services within the licensee's authorized scope of practice under the applicable practice act.(2) The level of review, supervision or approval required of a licensee before information, work product, recommendations or other output generated by artificial intelligence may be used or relied upon in providing services.(3) Disclosure by a licensee to the person receiving services regarding the use of artificial intelligence, 20260HB2678PN3721 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including the manner, content and timing of a plain-language disclosure, when the person is receiving information, work product or services generated in whole or in substantial part by artificial intelligence.(4) A requirement that each person receiving services shall be provided with the option to communicate directly with a licensee, rather than solely through artificial intelligence, and the process for exercising that option.(5) The duties and obligations of a licensee when using artificial intelligence, including the responsibility of a licensee to exercise professional judgment and comply with all ethical, confidentiality, recordkeeping and other obligations imposed on the licensee under the applicable practice act, notwithstanding the use of artificial intelligence in providing services.(6) Limitations on the use of artificial intelligence, including that artificial intelligence may not independently perform professional services, make professional decisions, establish a professional relationship or fulfill a duty imposed on a licensee under the applicable practice act.(7) The circumstances under which the use of artificial intelligence may constitute unprofessional conduct, a violation of the applicable practice act or grounds for discipline.(c) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to:(1) limit the authority of a licensing board or licensing commission to regulate the use of artificial intelligence by licensees under a practice act; or(2) require disclosure of the use of artificial 20260HB2678PN3721 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 intelligence for a purely administrative, clerical or ministerial function that does not involve individualized professional advice, recommendations, evaluations, treatment, analysis or decisions.(d) Regulations.--A licensing board or licensing commission may promulgate regulations as necessary to implement this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2678PN3721 - 4 - 12345678